Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Penalties

353.990.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any of the provisions of KRS

353.050

to

353.130

or KRS

353.200

relating to the manner of drilling and casing or plugging and filling any well, or fixing the distance from wells within which mining operations may not be conducted, or any person who willfully violates any of the terms of an order of the department allowing mining operations within a lesser distance of any well than that prescribed by this chapter shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned in jail for not more than twelve (12) months, or both.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS

353.150

shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense and in addition thereto one hundred dollars ($100) for each thirty (30) days the violation continues. The penalty shall be recovered in a civil action in the name of the Commonwealth for the use of the county in which the well is located.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

353.160

shall be fined not more than two hundred dollars ($200) and, if the offender is a natural person, imprisoned not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months. Each day that the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of subsection (1) of KRS

353.180

shall be fined not less than one hundred ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

If any person violates any of the provisions of KRS

353.190

he shall be fined five dollars ($5) for every twenty-four (24) hours that the violation continues.

History.

3766b-18, 3766-21, 3912, 3914a, 4358, 4359.

353.991.
Penalties for violation of KRS 353.500 to 353.720 and 353.735 to 353.747.

Any person who violates KRS 353.570(1) shall be subject to a civil penalty assessed by the cabinet of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and the department may require the proper plugging of the well. The civil penalty order may be appealed pursuant to KRS

353.700

within thirty (30) days of assessment. Any person who knowingly and willfully violates KRS 353.570(1) shall upon conviction be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one hundred and eighty (180) days, or both.

Any person who continues to violate any provision of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or

353.735

to

353.747

, or any regulation or order promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or

353.735

to

353.747

, after being notified in writing of the violation by the department shall upon conviction be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one hundred and eighty (180) days, or both.

Any person who does any of the following for the purpose of evading or violating KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or

353.735

to

353.747

, or any regulation or order promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or

353.735

to

353.747

, shall upon conviction be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and be subject to a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one hundred and eighty (180) days, or both:

Makes or causes to be made a false entry or statement in a report, record, account or memorandum, required by KRS 353.500 to 353.720 or 353.735 to 353.747, or by any regulation or order;

Omits or causes to be omitted from a report, record, account or memorandum full, true, and correct entries and information as required by KRS 353.500 to 353.720 or 353.735 to 353.747, or by any regulation or order;

Removes from this Commonwealth or destroys, mutilates, alters or falsifies a report, record, account or memorandum required by KRS 353.500 to 353.720 or 353.735 to 353.747, or by any regulation or order.

Any person who knowingly aids or abets any other person in the violation of any provision of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or

353.735

to

353.747

, or any regulation or order promulgated or issued under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

or

353.735

to

353.747

, shall be subject to the same penalty as that prescribed in this section for the violation by the other person.

All civil penalties recovered under this section shall be deposited into the oil and gas well plugging fund established in KRS 353 .590(27) and shall be for the plugging of any abandoned wells coming within the authority of the department pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 24; 1974, ch. 45, § 8; 1984, ch. 244, § 2, effective January 1, 1985; 1990, ch. 10, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 2019 ch. 21, § 9, effective June 27, 2019.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The posting of a red notice tag, properly completed, in a conspicuous place at the well site, is sufficient to put the operator on notice of his violation and will satisfy the requirements of this section but where it is possible, additional notice should be given by personal service or registered letter.

OAG 73-703

.

353.992.
Penalties.

Any person who violates KRS

353.592

or who fails to perform any duties imposed by KRS

353.592

or who violates any permit, rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each day of such violation or, if such violation is willful, such person may, in lieu of the civil penalty, be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each day of such violation and may concurrently with such civil penalty or fine be enjoined from any such violation. The civil penalties or fines shall be assessed by the Circuit Court of the county in which the violation occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 277, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.